Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1007
Sections, how
construed.

Sections 28-1004 to 28-1006 shall not
be construed to amend or in any manner change the authority of the Game and
Parks Commission under the Game Law, to prohibit any conduct authorized or
permitted in the Game Law, or to prohibit the training of animals for
any purpose not prohibited by law.

Laws 1988, LB 170, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 393;

Laws 2010, LB252, § 4.

Game Law, see section 37-201.